src/estar.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +V +1p +2p +3p +sg +pl +mInd +mSub +mCond +mImp +tFut +tPres +tImp +tPret +pastPart +Gerund GV1 GV2 GV3
LEXICON Root
!estar Verb1;


!Verbs ending in ar
!LEXICON Verb1
estar+V+1p+sg+tPres+mInd:estoy #;
estar+V+2p+sg+tPres+mInd:estás #;
estar+V+3p+sg+tPres+mInd:está #;
estar+V+1p+pl+tPres+mInd:estamos #;
estar+V+2p+pl+tPres+mInd:estáis #;
estar+V+3p+pl+tPres+mInd:están #;

estar+V+1p+sg+tImp+mInd:estaba #;
estar+V+2p+sg+tImp+mInd:estaba #;
estar+V+3p+sg+tImp+mInd:estaba #;
estar+V+1p+pl+tImp+mInd:estábamos #;
estar+V+2p+pl+tImp+mInd:estabais #;
estar+V+3p+pl+tImp+mInd:estaban #;

estar+V+1p+sg+tPret:estuve #;
estar+V+2p+sg+tPret:estuviste #;
estar+V+3p+sg+tPret:estuvo #;
estar+V+1p+pl+tPret:estuvimos #;
estar+V+2p+pl+tPret:estuvisteis #;
estar+V+3p+pl+tPret:estuvieron #;

estar+V+1p+sg+tFut+mInd:estaré #;
estar+V+2p+sg+tFut+mInd:estarás #;
estar+V+3p+sg+tFut+mInd:estará #;
estarV+1p+pl+tFut+mInd:estaremos #;
estar+V+2p+pl+tFut+mInd:estaréis #;
estar+V+3p+pl+tFut+mInd:estarán #;

estar+V+1p+sg+mCond:estaría #;
estar+V+2p+sg+mCond:estarías #;
estar+V+3p+sg+mCond:estaría #;
estar+V+1p+pl+mCond:estaríamos #;
estar+V+2p+pl+mCond:estaríais #;
estar+V+3p+pl+mCond:estarían #;

estar+V+1p+sg+tPres+mSub:esté #;
estar+V+2p+sg+tPres+mSub:estés #;
estar+V+3p+sg+tPres+mSub:esté #;
estar+V+1p+pl+tPres+mSub:estemos #;
estar+V+2p+pl+tPres+mSub:estéis #;
estar+V+3p+pl+tPres+mSub:estén #;

estar+V+1p+sg+tImp+mSub:estuviera #;
estar+V+2p+sg+tImp+mSub:estuvieras #;
estar+V+3p+sg+tImp+mSub:estuviera #;
estar+V+1p+pl+tImp+mSub:estuviéramos #;
estar+V+2p+pl+tImp+mSub:estuvierais #;
estar+V+3p+pl+tImp+mSub:estuvieran #;
estar+V+1p+sg+tImp+mSub:estuviese #;
estar+V+2p+sg+tImp+mSub:estuvieses #;
estar+V+3p+sg+tImp+mSub:estuviese #;
estar+V+1p+pl+tImp+mSub:estuviésemos #;
estar+V+2p+pl+tImp+mSub:estuvieseis #;
estar+V+3p+pl+tImp+mSub:estuviesen #;

estar+V+1p+sg+tFut+mSub:estuviere #;
estar+V+2p+sg+tFut+mSub:estuvieres #;
estar+V+3p+sg+tFut+mSub:estuviere #;
estar+V+1p+pl+tFut+mSub:estuviéremos #;
estar+V+2p+pl+tFut+mSub:estuviereis #;
estar+V+3p+pl+tFut+mSub:estuvieren #;

estar+V+pastPart:estado #;

estar+V+Gerund:estando #;
